Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.011

Purpose.

The legislature finds that the department of licensing administers laws relating to the licensing and regulation of professions, businesses, and other activities in addition to administering laws relating to the licensing and regulation of vehicles and vehicle operators, dealers, and manufacturers. The laws administered by the department have the common denominator of licensing and regulation and are directed toward protecting and enhancing the well-being of the residents of the state.

[ 2010 c 161 s 201; 1994 c 92 s 500; 1979 c 158 s 113; 1977 ex.s. c 334 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 334: "This 1977 amendatory act shall take effect on July 1, 1977." [ 1977 ex.s. c 334 s 8.]